Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-501
Rural and suburban fire protection districts; organization; necessity.

It is recognized, found, and declared: (1) That it is in the public interest to encourage residents and property owners in rural and suburban areas in the state to organize, equip, and maintain local firefighting bodies corporate and politic for the purpose of providing the same type of protection of their lives and property against loss or destruction by fire as is available to residents of incorporated cities and villages; and (2) that the organization and establishment of adequately equipped and maintained local bodies corporate and politic for such purposes will promote the public health, convenience, safety, and welfare through the preservation and protection of lives and resources in rural and suburban areas in the state.

Laws 1949, c. 98, § 1, p. 262;

Laws 1955, c. 128, § 1, p. 363.

City may annex territory within fire protection district. City of Bellevue v. Eastern Sarpy County S. F. P. Dist., 180 Neb. 340, 143 N.W.2d 62 (1966).

Cost of maintenance is provided by annual tax. Village of Niobrara v. Tichy, 158 Neb. 517, 63 N.W.2d 867 (1954).